Utah statutes.
76-10-1217.   Intent to prevent commercial distribution and exhibition of
pornographic films--Local regulation and other laws not limited.
(1)  It is the intent of this act to prevent the commercial distribution and
exhibition of films in this state which are pornographic.  There is
substantial evidence that elements of organized crime have engaged to an
increasing degree in the production and distribution of such films and,
therefore, it is the further intent of this act to facilitate the criminal
prosecution of distributors of pornographic films.
(2)  It is not the intent of this act to limit the regulation of films by
counties, cities, towns, and other political subdivisions within the state,
and these subdivisions are specifically given the right by this act to further
regulate films.  Nor is it the intent of this act to limit or abridge the
power to otherwise prosecute violations of any other provisions of law
including, but not limited to, those provisions of Part 12 of Title 76,
Chapter 10.
